Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7906
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Health Care Quality Improvement Act, the definitions found in sections 71-7907 to 71-7910.01 apply.

Laws 2011, LB431, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB119, § 2.